Maine, session 132, LD1482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4706, as amended by PL 2023, c. 537, §§1 and 2, is further
amended to read:
§4706. Instruction in American history, African American studies, Maine studies,
Wabanaki studies, LGBTQ+ studies and the history of genocide
Instruction in American history, African American studies, government, citizenship,
Maine studies, LGBTQ+ studies and the history of genocide must be aligned with the
parameters for essential instruction and graduation requirements established under section
6209.
1. American history. American history, government and citizenship, including the
United States Constitution, the Declaration of Independence, the importance of voting and
the privileges and responsibilities of citizenship, must be taught in and required for
graduation from all elementary and secondary schools, both public and private. African
American studies and LGBTQ+ studies must be included in the review of content standards
and performance indicators of the system of learning results conducted in accordance with
section 6209, subsection 4.
2. Maine studies. Maine history, including the Constitution of Maine, Maine
geography and environment and the natural, industrial and economic resources of Maine
and Maine's cultural and ethnic heritage, must be taught. A required component of Maine
studies is Wabanaki studies, and Wabanaki studies may be taught as a component of other
content areas, as appropriate, including but not limited to the content areas of English
language arts, mathematics, science and fine arts. Wabanaki studies and, Maine African
American studies and Maine LGBTQ+ studies must be included in the review of content
standards and performance indicators of the learning results conducted in accordance with
section 6209, subsection 4. Wabanaki studies must address the following topics:
A. Wabanaki governments and political systems and their relationship with local, state,
national and international governments;
B. Wabanaki cultural systems and the experience of tribal people throughout history;
C. Wabanaki territories; and
D. Wabanaki economic systems.
3. History of genocide. The history of genocide, including the Holocaust, must be
included in the review of content standards and performance indicators of the system of
learning results conducted in accordance with section 6209, subsection 4.
4. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"LGBTQ+" means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, questioning and other allied
communities.